Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2508
Poisons; sale to minors and incompetents, prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person in this state to sell or deliver any poison to any minor under eighteen years of age or to any person known to be of unsound mind or under the influence of intoxicants.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 14, p. 565;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-933;

R.S.1943, § 81-632.